Oklahoma, session 2025, SB982.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 128 of Title 60, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No alien or any person who is not a citizen of the United


States shall own or lease real property in this state either


directly or indirectly through a business entity or trust.


Provided, however, the requirements of this subsection shall not


apply to a business entity that is engaged in regulated interstate


commerce in accordance with federal law.



Req. No. 399 Page 1


B. On or after the effective date of this act, any deed or


lease for real property shall include as an exhibit an affidavit


executed by the person or entity leasing the land attesting that the


person, business entity, or trust is purchasing or leasing the land


in compliance with the requirements of this section and that no


funding source is being used in violation of this section or any


other state or federal law. The Attorney General shall promulgate a


separate affidavit form for individuals and for business entities or


trusts to comply with the requirements of this section, with the


exception of those leases which the Attorney General deems necessary


when promulgating the affidavit form.


C. From the effective date of this act, any lease found to be


in violation of this section shall not be eligible for renewal and


all rights to the leased real property shall immediately revert back


to the lessor at the expiration of the lease.


D. From the effective date of this act, any alien or person who


is not a citizen of the United States who owns real property in this


state shall have six (6) months to divest his or her ownership in


the real property.


E. If after the expiration of six (6) months from the effective


date of this act any alien or person who is not a citizen of the


United States continues to own real property in this state, the


Attorney General shall be authorized to bring an action in district


court to enforce the provisions of this act.

Req. No. 399 Page 2


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-399 TEK 1/19/2025 5:47:11 AM











































Req. No. 399 Page 3